Maryland, session 2026, HB1432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
3–216.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1432*

HOUSE BILL 1432
(a) There is a Transportation Trust Fund for the Department.
(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided by statute, there shall be credited to
the Transportation Trust Fund for the account of the Department all taxes, fees, charges,
and revenues collected or received by or paid, appropriated, or credited to the account of
the Department or any of its units in the exercise of their rights, powers, duties, or
obligations, including the cash proceeds of the sale of consolidated transportation bonds,
notes, or other evidences of obligation issued by the Department, any General Fund
appropriations, and the proceeds of any State loan or federal grant made for transportation
purposes.
13–936.3.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A MOTOR VEHICLE OF A
MODEL YEAR OF 2000 OR LATER THAT IS REGISTERED IN THE STATE AND WAS
PREVIOUSLY REGISTERED UNDER § 13–936 OF THIS SUBTITLE AS A CLASS L
(HISTORIC) VEHICLE MAY BE INSURED BY A HISTORIC VEHICLE, A SHOW VEHICLE,
OR AN ANTIQUE VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICY.
23–202.
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Administration and the
Secretary shall establish an emissions control program in the State in accordance with the
federal Clean Air Act.
(2) The program shall remain in effect only as long as required by federal
law.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the emissions control
program shall provide for a biennial exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment and
misfueling inspection for all vehicles of the 1977 model year and each model year thereafter.
(2) The emissions control program may not authorize an exhaust emissions
test or emissions equipment and misfueling inspection for any vehicle of a model year
earlier than the 1977 model year.
(3) (i) In this paragraph, “qualified hybrid vehicle” means an
automobile that:
1. Meets all applicable regulatory requirements;
2. Meets the current vehicle exhaust standard set under the
federal Tier 2 program for gasoline–powered passenger cars under 40 C.F.R. Part 80 et seq.;
and

HOUSE BILL 1432 3
3. Can draw propulsion energy from both of the following
sources of stored energy:
A. Gasoline or diesel fuel; and
B. A rechargeable energy storage system.
(ii) A qualified hybrid vehicle is not required to submit to a first
exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment and misfueling inspection until 3 years
after the date on which the vehicle was first registered in the State.
23–205.1.
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A FEE OF $30 TO BE COLLECTED
ONCE EVERY 2 YEARS ON EACH MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTERED IN THE STATE THAT
WAS PREVIOUSLY REGISTERED UNDER § 13–936 OF THIS ARTICLE AS A CLASS L
(HISTORIC) VEHICLE AND IS EXEMPT FROM MANDATORY INSPECTIONS UNDER §
23–206.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
23–206.3.
A MOTOR VEHICLE WITH A MODEL YEAR OF 2000 OR LATER THAT IS
REGISTERED IN THE STATE AND WAS PREVIOUSLY REGISTERED UNDER § 13–936 OF
THIS ARTICLE AS A CLASS L (HISTORIC) VEHICLE IS EXEMPT FROM THE MANDATORY
INSPECTIONS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.